Illinois, session 104th, HB5226.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-810.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-810.1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-810.1)7    Sec. 3-810.1. Tow truck; registration plates. 8    (a) Subject to subsection (b), tow Tow truck operators 9registered under this Code may obtain registration plates for 10use as provided in this Code at the rate per set provided in 11subsection (a) of Section 3-815 of this Code for each vehicle 12so registered.13    (b) Only tow truck operators holding a valid current 14license or registration issued by the Illinois Commerce 15Commission under this Code may obtain registration plates for 16tow trucks registered under this Code, as long as:17        (1) each light-duty tow truck is equipped as a 18    self-loader or a flatbed truck;19        (2) each medium-duty tow truck is equipped as a 20    wrecker, a flatbed, a self-loader, or a combination truck; 21    and22        (3) each heavy-duty tow truck or tractor is equipped 23    as a wrecker truck.  HB5226- 2 -LRB104 19761 LNS 33211 b1    Upon revocation of any such license or registration issued 2by the Illinois Commerce Commission, the tow truck operator 3shall immediately surrender the registration plates issued 4under this Section to the Secretary of State.5    (c) For purposes of this Section:6    "Light-duty tow truck" means a vehicle designed to safely 7transport vehicles weighing 8,000 pounds or less.8    "Medium-duty tow truck" means a vehicle designed to safely 9transport vehicles weighing more than 8,000 pounds, but not 10more than 26,000 pounds.11    "Heavy-duty tow truck or tractor" means a vehicle designed 12to safely transport vehicles weighing more than 26,000 pounds. 13(Source: P.A. 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.)